District of Columbia statutes.
11-1704

Oath of the Executive Officer.

The Executive Officer shall take an oath or affirmation for the faithful and impartial discharge of the duties of that office.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 510, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(83), 108 Stat. 713
Oct. 18, 2004, 118 Stat. 1345, Pub. L. 108-335, § 329
Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2026, Pub. L. 109-356, § 116(a)
1981 Ed., § 11-1704.
1973 Ed., § 11-1704.
Pub. L. 108-335 repealed subsec. (b) which had read as follows: “(b) The Executive Officer shall give bond, with two or more sureties, to be approved by the Joint Committee, in an amount prescribed by the Joint Committee, faithfully to discharge the duties of that office.”
Pub. L. 109-356 made a technical correction to Pub. L. 108-335 that deleted the subsec. (a) designation.
Section 116(c) of Pub. L. 109-356 provided that the amendments made by this section shall take effect as if included in the enactment of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 2005 [Pub. L. 108-335].